Vermont, session 2025-2026, H346.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 2155 is amended to read:
§ 2155. FEES AND CHARGES
(a) Towing fees. For towing an abandoned motor vehicle from private
property, a towing service may charge a reasonable fee that is not more than
VT LEG #381010 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.346
2025 Page 2 of 5
$130.00 or $4.50 per mile towed, whichever is greater, to be paid by the
vehicle owner or the landowner of the private property.
(b) Storage charges. In addition to any towing fee, an owner or lienholder
reclaiming an abandoned motor vehicle may be charged and shall pay a fee for
the costs of storage of the vehicle that is not more than $35.00 per day, except
that no fee may be charged for storage for any period preceding the date upon
which the form for abandoned motor vehicle certification is sent to the
Department.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section or any other
provision of law to the contrary, a person who has submitted a timely report to
an appropriate law enforcement agency that a vehicle towed pursuant to the
provisions of this subchapter was stolen shall not be liable for:
(1) any towing fees assessed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a)
of this section;
(2) any storage charges that accrue prior to seven days after the date on
which a second notice is sent to the owner of the motor vehicle pursuant to the
provisions of subdivision 2154(a)(3) of this subchapter; and
(3) any related fees, charges, fines, or penalties assessed pursuant to a
municipal parking or abandoned motor vehicle ordinance.
VT LEG #381010 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.346
2025 Page 3 of 5
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 2154 is amended to read:
§ 2154. IDENTIFICATION AND RECLAMATION OF ABANDONED
MOTOR VEHICLES
(a) The Department shall make a reasonable attempt to locate an owner of
an abandoned motor vehicle.
* * *
(3) If the abandoned motor vehicle has been reported as stolen to an
appropriate law enforcement agency or matches the description of a motor
vehicle that has been reported as stolen to an appropriate law enforcement
agency, the Department shall, within three business days after receipt of the
form for certification of abandoned motor vehicle, send notice to the registered
owner and lienholder of the vehicle. The notice shall be sent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, and shall advise the registered owner of the motor
vehicle’s location and a telephone number where additional information about
the motor vehicle may be obtained. If the receipt is not returned to the
Department within seven business days, the Commissioner shall, by first-class
mail, send a second notice.
* * *
Sec. 3. STOLEN, ABANDONED VEHICLES; REMOVAL AND
STORAGE; COSTS; WORKING GROUP; REPORT
VT LEG #381010 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.346
2025 Page 4 of 5
(a) Creation. There is created the Costs for Removal and Storage of
Abandoned, Stolen Motor Vehicles Working Group to identify funding and a
process for reimbursing towing services and municipalities for costs related to
the removal and storage of abandoned, stolen motor vehicles.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Treasurer or designee;
(2) the Attorney General or designee;
(3) the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee; and
(4) the Executive Director for the Center for Crime Victim Services or
designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall study potential sources of
funding and processes for reimbursing towing services and municipalities for
fees, charges, and other amounts that the towing service or municipality is
unable to collect pursuant to the provisions of 23 V.S.A. § 2155(c).
(d) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary and
on Transportation with its findings and any recommendations for legislative
action.
(e) Meetings.
VT LEG #381010 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.346
2025 Page 5 of 5
(1) The Treasurer or designee shall call the first meeting of the Working
Group to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Treasurer or designee shall be the Chair.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on December 31, 2025.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 3 of this act shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #381010 v.1